Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1093.04
Order for delivery of property.

If the court finds at such hearing that the plaintiff is entitled to possession of the property, it shall order the clerk to issue an order for delivery of the property to the plaintiff, and deliver such order for delivery to the sheriff or other officer to be served and returned according to sections 25-1096 and 25-1097. The order of the court required by this section shall conform to the content requirements of section 25-1094.

Laws 1973, LB 474, § 5.